Utah statutes.
53-14-101.   Law enforcement and training academy applicants -- Employer
background information.
(1)  As used in this section:
(a)  "Director" means the director of a certified law enforcement officer
training academy.
(b)  "Employer" includes a public employer and a private employer.
(c)  "Law enforcement agency" has the same definition as in Section 53-1-102.
(d)  "Law enforcement officer" has the same definition as in Section
53-13-103, and includes those officers in administrative positions.
(e)  "Training academy" means a peace officer training institution certified
in accordance with the standards developed under Section 53-6-105.
(2)  A current or former employer and the director of any training academy an
applicant has attended or graduated from shall provide available information
in accordance with this section regarding an applicant if the request complies
with Subsection (3) and is submitted by:
(a)  a law enforcement agency regarding an applicant for an employment
position; or
(b)  the director of a law enforcement training academy for which the
applicant requests admission under Section 53-6-203.
(3)  The request for information pursuant to Subsection (2) shall be:
(a)  in writing;
(b)  accompanied by an authorization signed by the applicant and notarized by
a notary public, in which the applicant consents to the release of the
requested information and releases the employer or training academy providing
the information from liability; and
(c)  addressed to the employer or director and signed by a sworn officer or
other authorized representative of the requesting law enforcement agency or
the academy.
(4)  The information that a law enforcement agency or the director of an
academy may request pursuant to Subsection (2) includes:
(a)  the date on which the applicant began his employment and, if applicable,
the date on which the employment of the applicant was terminated;
(b)  a list of the compensation that the employer provided to the applicant
during the course of the employment;
(c)  a copy of the application for a position of employment that the applicant
submitted to the employer;
(d)  a written evaluation of the performance of the applicant;
(e)  a record of the attendance of the applicant;
(f)  a record of disciplinary action taken against the applicant;
(g)  a statement regarding whether the employer would rehire the applicant
and, if the employer would not rehire the applicant, the reasons why;
(h)  if applicable, a record setting forth the reason that the employment of
the applicant was terminated and whether the termination was voluntary or
involuntary;
(i)  the record of any final action regarding an applicant's peace officer
certification that is based on an investigation concerning the applicant's
qualification for certification; and
(j)  notice of any pending or ongoing investigation regarding the applicant's
certification as a peace officer.
(5) (a)  In the absence of fraud or malice, an employer or training academy is
not subject to any civil liability for any relevant cause of action by
releasing employment information requested under this section.
(b)  This section does not in any way or manner abrogate or lessen the
existing common law or statutory privileges and immunities of an employer.
(c)  An employer or training academy may not provide information pursuant to
Subsection (2) if the disclosure of the information is prohibited pursuant to
federal or state law.
(6)  An employer's refusal to disclose information to a law enforcement agency
in accordance with this section constitutes grounds for a civil action by the
requesting agency for injunctive relief requiring disclosure on the part of an
employer.
(7) (a) (i)  A law enforcement agency may use the information received
pursuant to this section only to determine the suitability of an applicant for
employment.
(ii)  A director may use the information received pursuant to this section
only to determine the suitability of an applicant for acceptance at the
training academy.
(b)  Except as otherwise provided in Subsection (7)(c), a law enforcement
agency and a director shall maintain the confidentiality of information
received pursuant to this section.
(c) (i)  A law enforcement agency may share information regarding an applicant
that it receives pursuant to this section with another law enforcement agency
if:
(A)  the applicant is also an applicant for any employment position with the
other law enforcement agency; and
(B)  the confidentiality of the information is otherwise maintained.
(ii)  A director may share information regarding an applicant that is received
pursuant to this section with another training academy if:
(A)  the applicant is an applicant for acceptance at the other training
academy; and
(B)  the confidentiality of the information is otherwise maintained.
(iii)  A director may share information regarding an applicant, attendee, or
graduate of a training academy that is received pursuant to this section with
a law enforcement agency if:
(A)  the applicant is applying for a position as a peace officer with the law
enforcement agency; and
(B)  the confidentiality of the information is otherwise maintained.
(8)  This section applies to requests submitted to employers on and after July
1, 2003 for employment information under this section.
